Florida, session 2026, SB302.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSection 258.393, Florida Statutes, is amended to 30 read: 31 258.393âTerra Ceia Aquatic Preserve wastewater or effluent 32 discharge activities.â 33 (1)âThe following described area in Manatee County is 34 hereby designated by the Legislature for inclusion in the 35 aquatic preserve system under the Florida Aquatic Preserve Act 36 of 1975. Such area, to be known as the Terra Ceia Aquatic 37 Preserve, shall be included in the aquatic preserve system and 38 shall include the following described real property: Begin at a 39 point 165 feet north of the southwest corner of the northwest 40 quarter of Section 12, Township 33 South, Range 17 East, Manatee 41 County, thence run west to the mean high-water line of Tampa 42 Bay, said point being the point of beginning. From said point of 43 beginning, run northwesterly into the waters of Tampa Bay and 44 parallel to the Port Manatee ship channel to the Manatee 45 Hillsborough county line; thence run southwest along the 46 Manatee-Hillsborough county line to its intersection with the 47 Intracoastal Waterway; thence run south-southwesterly along the 48 Intracoastal Waterway to a point on a line connecting the 49 westernmost tip of Snead Island (Manatee County) to the 50 southernmost tip of Mullet Key (Pinellas County); thence run 51 southeasterly along said line to the westernmost tip of Snead 52 Island (also known as Emerson Point); thence run in a 53 northeasterly direction along the mean high-water line of Tampa 54 Bay, Terra Ceia Bay, where the mean high water line intersects 55 the north line of U.S. Government Lot 4, Section 16, Township 34 56 South, Range 17 East; thence east along the said north line of 57 U.S. Government Lot 4 and the easterly extension thereof a 58 distance of 1,111 feet more or less to the mean high water line 59 at a seawall; thence meander in a northwesterly, westerly, 60 northerly direction along the seawall of a canal; thence in a 61 northeasterly direction along the mean high water line of Miguel 62 Bay, Joe Bay, and Bishop Harbor to the point of beginning, 63 including tidal waters of all tributaries; less all privately 64 titled submerged lands and uplands. 65 (2)âWastewater or effluent discharge activities from an 66 existing stationary facility or existing stationary installation 67 which has been approved pursuant to state law or federal law or 68 for which facility or installation an application has been filed 69 before June 24, 1984, are exempt from the requirements of this 70 chapter. 71 (3)âNo further dredging or filling of the submerged lands 72 of the Terra Ceia Aquatic Preserve shall be approved or 73 tolerated by the board except: 74 (a)âSuch minimum dredging and spoiling as may be authorized 75 for public navigation projects or for such minimum dredging and 76 spoiling as may be constituted as a public necessity. 77 (b)âSuch other alteration of physical conditions, including 78 the placement of riprap, as may be necessary to enhance the 79 quality and utility of the preserve. 80 (c)âSuch dredging as is necessary for the purpose of 81 eliminating conditions hazardous to the public health or for the 82 purpose of eliminating stagnant waters, islands, and spoil 83 banks, the dredging of which would enhance the aesthetic and 84 environmental quality and utility of the preserve and be clearly 85 in the public interest as determined by the board. 86 (d)âSuch minimum dredging and filling as may be authorized 87 for the creation and maintenance of marinas, public boat ramps, 88 piers, and docks and their attendant navigation channels and 89 access roads. Such projects may be authorized only upon a 90 specific finding by the board that there is assurance that the 91 project will be constructed and operated in a manner that will 92 not adversely affect the water quality and utility of the 93 preserve. This paragraph may not be construed to authorize the 94 connection of upland canals to the waters of the preserve. 95 96 Any dredging and filling pursuant to paragraph (a), paragraph 97 (b), or paragraph (c) shall be approved by the board only after 98 public notice as provided in s. 253.115. 99 Section 2.âParagraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (3) of 100 section 258.397, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 101 258.397âBiscayne Bay Aquatic Preserve.â 102 (3)âAUTHORITY OF TRUSTEES.âThe Board of Trustees of the 103 Internal Improvement Trust Fund is authorized and directed to 104 maintain the aquatic preserve hereby created pursuant and 105 subject to the following provisions: 106 (b)âNo further dredging or filling of submerged lands of 107 the preserve shall be approved or tolerated by the board of 108 trustees except: 109 1.âSuch minimum dredging and spoiling as may be authorized 110 for public navigation projects or for such minimum dredging and 111 spoiling as may be constituted as a public necessity or for 112 preservation of the bay according to the expressed intent of 113 this section. 114 2.âSuch other alteration of physical conditions, including 115 the placement of riprap, as may be necessary to enhance the 116 quality and utility of the preserve. 117 3.âSuch minimum dredging and filling as may be authorized 118 for the creation and maintenance of marinas, piers, and docks 119 and their attendant navigation channels and access roads. Such 120 projects may only be authorized upon a specific finding by the 121 board of trustees that there is assurance that the project will 122 be constructed and operated in a manner that will not adversely 123 affect the water quality and utility of the preserve. This 124 subparagraph shall not authorize the connection of upland canals 125 to the waters of the preserve. 126 4.âSuch dredging as is necessary for the purpose of 127 eliminating conditions hazardous to the public health or for the 128 purpose of eliminating stagnant waters, islands, and spoil 129 banks, the dredging of which would enhance the aesthetic and 130 environmental quality and utility of the preserve and be clearly 131 in the public interest as determined by the board of trustees. 132 5.âSuch minimum dredging and filling as may be authorized 133 for the restoration and enhancement of natural systems, 134 including the management of substrate for vegetation planting 135 and restoration for mangroves, salt marshes, seagrasses, and 136 oyster reefs, to enhance the quality and utility of the preserve 137 and coastal resiliency. 138 139 Any dredging or filling under this subsection or improvements 140 under subsection (5) shall be approved only after public notice 141 as provided by s. 253.115. 142 (e)âNotwithstanding other provisions of this section, the 143 board of trustees may, respecting lands lying within Biscayne 144 Bay: 145 1.âEnter into agreements for and establish lines 146 delineating sovereignty and privately owned lands. 147 2.âEnter into agreements for the exchange of, and exchange, 148 sovereignty lands for privately owned lands. 149 3.âAccept gifts of land within or contiguous to the 150 preserve. 151 4.âNegotiate for, and enter into agreements with owners of 152 lands contiguous to sovereignty lands for, any public and 153 private use of any of such lands. 154 5.âTake any and all actions convenient for, or necessary 155 to, the accomplishment of any and all of the acts and matters 156 authorized by this paragraph. 157 6.âConduct restoration and enhancement efforts in Biscayne 158 Bay and its tributaries. 159 7.âStabilize eroding shorelines of Biscayne Bay and its 160 tributaries that are contributing to turbidity by planting 161 natural vegetation to the greatest extent feasible and by the 162 placement of riprap and living shorelines and seawalls, as 163 determined by Miami-Dade County in conjunction with the 164 Department of Environmental Protection. 165 8.âRequest the South Florida Water Management District to 166 enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of 167 Environmental Protection, the Biscayne National Park Service, 168 the Miami-Dade County Department of Environmental Resources 169 Management and, at their option, the Corps of Engineers to 170 include enhanced marine productivity in Biscayne Bay as an 171 objective when operating the Central and Southern Florida Flood 172 Control projects consistently with the goals of the water 173 management district, including flood protection, water supply, 174 and environmental protection. 175 Section 3.âParagraph (e) of subsection (3) of section 176 258.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 177 258.42âMaintenance of preserves.âThe Board of Trustees of 178 the Internal Improvement Trust Fund shall maintain such aquatic 179 preserves subject to the following provisions: 180 (3) 181 (e)âStructures may not be erected within the preserve, 182 except: 183 1.âPrivate residential docks may be approved for reasonable 184 ingress or egress of riparian owners. Slips at private 185 residential single-family docks which contain boat lifts or 186 davits that do not float in the water when loaded may not, in 187 whole or in part, be enclosed by walls, but may be roofed if the 188 roof does not overhang more than 1 foot beyond the footprint of 189 the lift and the boat stored at the lift. Such roofs are not 190 included in the square-footage calculation of a terminal 191 platform. 192 2.âPrivate residential multislip docks may be approved if 193 located within a reasonable distance of a publicly maintained 194 navigation channel, or a natural channel of adequate depth and 195 width to allow operation of the watercraft for which the docking 196 facility is designed without the craft having an adverse impact 197 on marine resources. The distance shall be determined in 198 accordance with criteria established by the trustees by rule, 199 based on the depth of the water, nature and condition of bottom, 200 and presence of manatees. 201 3.âCommercial docking facilities shown to be consistent 202 with the use or management criteria of the preserve may be 203 approved if the facilities are located within a reasonable 204 distance of a publicly maintained navigation channel, or a 205 natural channel of adequate depth and width to allow operation 206 of the watercraft for which the docking facility is designed 207 without the craft having an adverse impact on marine resources. 208 The distance shall be determined in accordance with criteria 209 established by the trustees by rule, based on the depth of the 210 water, nature and condition of bottom, and presence of manatees. 211 4.âStructures for shore protection, including restoration 212 of seawalls at their previous location or upland of or within 18 213 inches waterward of their previous location, approved 214 navigational aids, or public utility crossings authorized under 215 paragraph (a) may be approved. 216 5.âNature-based solutions to improve coastal resiliency, 217 including living seawalls, shoreline and vegetation planting, 218 seagrass planting, wave attenuation devices, and green or hybrid 219 green-gray stormwater infrastructure, which are sited to provide 220 the most appropriate benefit. 221 222 A structure under this paragraph or chapter 253 may not be 223 prohibited solely because the local government fails to adopt a 224 marina plan or other policies dealing with the siting of such 225 structures in its local comprehensive plan. 226 Section 4.âSection 380.0938, Florida Statutes, is created 227 to read: 228 380.0938âNature-based methods for improving coastal 229 resiliency.â 230 (1)âBy January 1, 2027, the department shall develop design 231 guidelines and standards for optimal combinations of nature 232 based methods for using green or hybrid green-gray 233 infrastructure to address coastal resiliency, including local 234 mitigation strategies for erosion control, sea-level rise, and 235 storm surge. 236 (2)âBy January 1, 2027, the department must initiate 237 rulemaking, subject to legislative ratification, to provide for 238 a clear and consistent statewide permitting process under s. 239 373.4131 for nature-based methods for improving coastal 240 resiliency and to address all of the following: 241 (a)âCriteria and thresholds for permits to implement 242 nature-based methods, including monitoring, inspection, and 243 reporting requirements. 244 (b)âProcedures governing the review of applications and 245 notices, duration and modification of permits, operational 246 requirements, and transfers of permits. 247 (c)âProvisions for emergencies, abandonment and removal of 248 systems, and significant erosion in areas of critical state 249 concern. 250 (d)âExemptions and general permits that do not allow 251 significant adverse impacts to occur individually or 252 cumulatively. 253 (e)âImprovement of coastal resiliency using nature-based 254 solutions, including living seawalls, shoreline and vegetation 255 planting, seagrass planting, wave attenuation devices, green or 256 hybrid green-gray stormwater infrastructure, beach 257 renourishment, dune and wetland restoration, reinforced dunes, 258 reef restoration, and ecologically sound building materials. 259 (f)âProtection and maintenance of access to and navigation 260 of the marked channel and the right-of-way of the Florida 261 Intracoastal Waterway as defined in s. 327.02. 262 (g)âCreation of permitting incentives for the use of new 263 strategies and technologies, such as 3D printing and other forms 264 of manufacturing, for living shorelines and nature-based 265 features for coastal protection. 266 (h)âIncentives to encourage local governmental entities to 267 create projects using nature-based solutions for coastal 268 protection through the Resilient Florida Grant Program pursuant 269 to s. 380.093(3)(b)1.d. 270 (i)âGuidelines for determining when a nature-based 271 solutions project is clearly in the public interest and safety 272 under s. 373.414(1)(a). 273 (j)âDevelopment of a clear and efficient permitting process 274 after designated storm events or disasters to replace failed 275 coastal infrastructure with nature-based or green or hybrid 276 green-gray infrastructure that follows established guidelines in 277 subsection (1). 278 (k)âIdentification of ways local governmental entities can 279 participate in coastal resiliency, including: 280 1.âMangrove replanting and hydrological restoration 281 programs. 282 2.âRestoration of oyster reefs, salt marshes, seagrass 283 beds, and coral reefs. 284 3.âIdentification and monitoring of threats to mangroves. 285 4.âProtection of barrier and spoil islands. 286 (3)âThe department and local governments shall promote 287 public awareness and education on the value of nature-based 288 solutions for coastal resiliency, including the preservation and 289 restoration of wetlands, floodplains, seagrasses, mangroves, and 290 other natural systems along the coastline. 291 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.